Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
INVESTIGATIONS, EXAMINATIONS, HEARINGS AND APPEALS

§431:2-301 Purpose. The purpose of
this part is to provide an effective and efficient system for examining the
activities, operations, financial condition, and affairs of all persons transacting
the business of insurance in this State and all persons otherwise subject to
the jurisdiction of the commissioner. The provisions of this part are intended
to enable the commissioner to adopt a flexible system of examinations that
directs resources as may be deemed appropriate and necessary for the
administration of the insurance and insurance-related laws of this State. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1993, c 321, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next